apertium-es.es.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<dictionary>

<alphabet>AÀBCDEÈFGHIÌJKLMNÑOÒPQRSTUÙVWXYZaàbcdeèfghiìjklmnñoòpqrstuùvwxyz</alphabet>

<sdefs>
   <sdef n="n"/>
   <sdef n="sg"/>
   <sdef n="pl"/>
   <sdef n="vb"/>
   <sdef n="adj"/>
   <sdef n="prep"/>
   <sdef n="p1"/>
   <sdef n="p2"/>
   <sdef n="p3"/>
   <sdef n="inf"/>
   <sdef n="pri"/>
</sdefs>

<pardefs>
	<pardef n="taco__n">
		<e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>s</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

        <pardef n="bus__n">
                <e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
                <e><p><l>es</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        </pardef>

	<pardef n="cactus__n">
                <e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
                <e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

        <pardef n="en__prep"> 
                <e><p><l/><r><s n="prep"/></r></p></e>
        </pardef>

        <pardef n="viaj/ar__vb">
                <e><p><l>ar</l><r><s n="vb"/><s n="inf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>o</l><r><s n="vb"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>as</l><r><s n="vb"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>a</l><r><s n="vb"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>amos</l><r><s n="vb"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>an</l><r><s n="vb"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>an</l><r><s n="vb"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        </pardef>


</pardefs>

<section id="main" type="standard">
	<e lm="bus"><i>bus</i><par n="taco__n"/></e>
        <e lm="viajar"><i>viaj</i><par n="viaj/ar__vb"/></e>
        <e lm="termòmetro"><i>termòmetro</i><par n="taco__n"/></e>
        <e lm="dos"><i>dos</i><par n="taco__n"/></e>
        <e lm="mil"><i>mil</i><par n="bus__n"/></e>
	<e lm="en"><i>en</i><par n="en__prep"/></e>
	<e lm="para"><i>para</i><par n="en__prep"/></e>
	<e lm="con"><i>con</i><par n="en__prep"/></e>
	<e lm="pasar-tiempo"><i>pasar-tiempo</i><par n="en__prep"/></e>
</section>

</dictionary>
